Hawaii statutes.
§415A-3 Purposes. (a) Except as
provided in this section, professional corporations may be organized under this
chapter only for the purpose of rendering professional services and services
ancillary thereto within a single profession.

(b) A professional corporation may be
incorporated for the purpose of rendering professional services within two or
more professions, and for any purpose or purposes for which corporations may be
organized under chapter 414, to the extent that any combination of professional
purposes or of professional and business purposes is permitted by the licensing
laws and rules of this State applicable to the professions. [L 1985, c 259, pt
of §1; am L 1987, c 135, §108; am L 2002, c 40, §43]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next